Maryland, session 2026, SB0481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
9–105.
In any custody or visitation proceeding, if the court determines that a party to a
custody or visitation order has unjustifiably denied or interfered with visitation granted by
a custody or visitation order, the court, IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE CHILD:
(1) SHALL ORDER ADDITIONAL PERIODS OF VISITATION TO BE
SCHEDULED THAT ARE:
(I) OF THE SAME TYPE, INCLUDING WEEKEND, HOLIDAY, OR
SUMMER VISITATION TIME, AS THE VISITATION THAT WAS DENIED OR INTERFERED
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0481*

SENATE BILL 481
WITH, AND DOUBLE THE DURATION OF THE VISITATION THAT WAS DENIED OR
INTERFERED WITH;
(II) AT A TIME THAT THE OTHER PARTY CHOOSES; AND
(III) WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE COURT DETERMINATION THAT
THE VISITATION HAD BEEN UNJUSTIFIABLY DENIED OR INTERFERED WITH; AND
(2) may, in addition to any other remedy available to the court [and in a
manner consistent with the best interests of the child], take any or all of the following
actions:
[(1) order that the visitation be rescheduled;
(2)] (I) modify the custody or visitation order to require additional terms
or conditions designed to ensure future compliance with the order; or
[(3)] (II) assess costs or counsel fees against the party who has
unjustifiably denied or interfered with visitation rights.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.